src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VI5-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:tugaim	NegImper;
+2P+Sg:tabhair	NegImper;
+3P+Sg:tugadh	NegImper;
+1P+Pl:tugaimis NegImper;
+2P+Pl:tugaigí	NegImper;
+3P+Pl:tugaidís	NegImper;
+Auto:tugtar	NegImper;




!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI6	! TAR (Irregular)


+PresInd:0	VI6-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0	VI6-PastInd;
+FutInd:0	VI6-FutInd;
+PastImp:0	VI6-PastImp;

+Cond:0		VI6-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

+PresSubj:0	VI6-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:0	VI6-PastSubj;

+Imper:0	VI6-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON VI6-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:tig	NegQ;		! irregular
0:tagann	SufNegQ;
!!0:taganns	NegQ;
+1P+Sg:tagaim	NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:tagaimse	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:tagaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tagaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:tagtar	NegQ; ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:thagas	#; 

LEXICON VI6-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

0:táinig		NegQ2;		
0:ráinig		NegQ2;		! irregular/defective
+1P+Sg:tánag	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:tángas	NegQ2;		! variant
+1P+Sg+Emph:tángas-sa	NegQ2;		! variant
+2P+Sg:tánaís	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:tángaís	NegQ2;		! variant
+2P+Sg+Emph:tánaís-se	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:tángamar	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tángamarna	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:tángadar	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl+Emph:tángadarsan	NegQ2;
+Auto:tánathas	NegQ2;		! variant
+Auto:tángthas	NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI6-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:tiocfaidh		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:tiocfaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tiocfaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:tiocfar		NegQ;		
+Rel+Len:thiocfas		#;		

LEXICON VI6-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:tagadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:tagainn		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:tagtá		NegQ2;
!!!+3P+Sg:tagadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:tagaimis		NegQ2;
!!!+2P+Pl:tagadh		NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:tagaidís		NegQ2;
+Auto:tagtaí 		NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI6-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:tiocfadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:tiocfainn	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:tiocfá		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:tiocfása		NegQ2;
!!!+3P+Sg:tiocfadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:tiocfaimis	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tiocfaimisne	NegQ2;
!!!+2P+Pl:tiocfadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:tiocfaidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:tiocfaí		NegQ2;		


LEXICON VI6-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:taga		NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:tagaimid	NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tagaimidne	NegSubj;
+Auto:tagtar 	NegSubj;		

LEXICON VI6-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:tagainn	NegQ;
+2P+Sg:tagtá	NegQ;
+3P+Sg:tagadh 	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:tagaimis	NegQ;
+2P+Pl:tagadh	NegQ;
+3P+Pl:tagaidís NegQ;
+Auto:tagtaí    NegQ;		


LEXICON VI6-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:tagaim	NegImper;
+2P+Sg:tar	NegImper;
+3P+Sg:tagadh	NegImper;
+1P+Pl:tagaimis NegImper;
+2P+Pl:tagaigí	NegImper;
+3P+Pl:tagaidís	NegImper;
+Auto:tagtar	NegImper;




!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI7	! TÉIGH (Irregular)


+PresInd:0	VI7-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
				!!! see téigh - to heat (regular)
+PastInd:0	VI7-PastInd;	
+PastInd:0	VI7-PastIndDep; !*** Different dependant form
+FutInd:0	VI7-FutInd;
!!!+PastImp:0	VI7-PastImp;	!!! see téigh - to heat (regular)

+Cond:0		VI7-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

!!!+PresSubj:0	VI7-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:0	VI7-PastSubj;

!!!+Imper:0	VI7-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood
				!!! see téigh - to heat (regular)

LEXICON VI7-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
!!! PresInd is already available from regular téigh (to heat) 
!!0:téann			SufNegQ;
+Suf:téanns		NegQ;
!!!+1P+Sg:téim		NegQ;
!!!+1P+Sg+Emph:téimse		NegQ;
!!!+1P+Pl:téimid		NegQ;
!!!+1P+Pl+Emph:téimidne		NegQ;
!!!+Auto:téitear		NegQ; ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
!!!+Rel+Len:théas		#; 

LEXICON VI7-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

+Len:chuaigh	#;		
+1P+Sg+Len:chuas	#;
+1P+Sg+Emph+Len:chuas-sa	#;
+2P+Sg+Len:chuais	#;
+1P+Pl+Len:chuamar	#;
+1P+Pl+Emph+Len:chuamarna	#;
+3P+Pl+Len:chuadar	#;
+3P+Pl+Emph+Len:chuadarsan	#;
+Auto+Len:chuathas	#;		

LEXICON VI7-PastIndDep		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

!!!:deachaigh			#;		
+Dep:deachaigh			NegQDep;		
+Dep+Var:deachaidh		NegQDep;	! variant spelling ?
+Dep+1P+Pl:deachamar	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Pl+Emph:deachamarna	NegQDep;
+Dep+3P+Pl:deachadar	NegQDep;
+Dep+3P+Pl+Emph:deachadarsan	NegQDep;
+Dep+Auto:deachthas		NegQDep;		

LEXICON VI7-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:rachaidh		#;
+1P+Pl:rachaimid	#;
+1P+Pl+Emph:rachaimidne	#;
+Auto:rachfar		#;		
+Rel:rachas		#;		

!!!LEXICON VI7-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
!!! PastImp is already available from regular téigh (to heat) 
!!!0:téadh	NegQ2;
!!!+1P+Sg:téinn	NegQ2;
!!!+2P+Sg:téiteá	NegQ2;
!!!!!!+3P+Sg:téadh	NegQ2;
!!!+1P+Pl:téimis	NegQ2;
!!!!!!+2P+Pl:téadh	NegQ2;
!!!+3P+Pl:téidís	NegQ2;
!!!+Auto:téití	NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI7-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:rachadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:rachainn		NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:rachainnse		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:rachfá		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:rachfása		NegQ2;
!!!!+3P+Sg:rachadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:rachaimis	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:rachaimisne	NegQ2;
!!!+2P+Pl:rachadh		NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:rachaidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:rachfaí 		NegQIrreg;		


!!!LEXICON VI7-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
!!! PresSubj is already available from regular téigh (to heat) 
!!!0:té		NegSubj;
!!!+1P+Pl:téimid	NegSubj;
!!!+1P+Pl+Emph:téimidne	NegSubj;
!!!+Auto:téitear 	NegSubj;		

LEXICON VI7-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
!!! PastSubj is already available from regular téigh (to heat) 

0:téadh	NegQ;
+1P+Sg:téinn	NegQ;
+2P+Sg:téiteá	NegQ;
!!+3P+Sg:téadh	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:téimis	NegQ;
!!+2P+Pl:téadh	NegQ;
+3P+Pl:téidís	NegQ;
+Auto:téití	NegQ;		

!!!LEXICON VI7-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach
!!! Imper is already available from regular téigh (to heat) 

!!!+1P+Sg:téim	NegImper;
!!!+2P+Sg:téigh	NegImper;
!!!+3P+Sg:téadh	NegImper;
!!!+1P+Pl:téimis	NegImper;
!!!+2P+Pl:téígí	NegImper;
!!!+3P+Pl:téidís	NegImper;
!!!+Auto:téitear	NegImper; ! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar



!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI8a	! CHÍ (Irregular - Munster variation)


+PresInd:0	VI8a-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+FutInd:0	VI8a-FutInd;
+Cond:0		VI8a-Cond;
+PastImp:0	VI8a-PastImp;

LEXICON VI8a-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:cíonn		NegQ2;
+Suf:cíonns	NegQ2;
0:cí		NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:cím	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:címse	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:címid	NegQ2;
+Auto:cítear	NegQ2;	! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:chíos	#;

LEXICON VI8a-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:cífidh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:cífead	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:cífir	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:cífimid	NegQ2;
+Auto:cífear	NegQ2;		
+Rel+Len:chífeas	#;

LEXICON VI8a-Cond
0:cífeadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:cífinn	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:cífinnse	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:cífeá	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:cífeása	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:cífimis	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:cífidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:cífí	NegQ2;		
+Rel+Len:chífeas	#;

LEXICON VI8a-PastImp		! Past Imperfect - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite

0:cíodh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:cínn	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:cínnse	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:cítheá	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:cítheása	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:címis	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:címisne	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:cídís	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl+Emph:cídís-sean	NegQ2;
+Auto:cítí	NegQ2;
+Rel+Len:chíos	#;			! relative: a chíos
!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI8b	! TCHÍ (Irregular - Ulster variation)

+PresInd:0	VI8b-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+FutInd:0	VI8b-FutInd;
+Cond:0		VI8b-Cond;
+PastImp:0	VI8b-PastImp;

LEXICON VI8b-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:tchíonn	#;
+Suf:tchíonns	#;
0:tchí		#;
+1P+Sg:tchím	#;
+1P+Sg+Emph:tchímse	#;
+1P+Pl:tchímid	#;
+Auto:tchítear	#;	! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:tchíos	#;

LEXICON VI8b-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:tchífidh	#;
+1P+Sg:tchífead	#;
+2P+Sg:tchífir	#;
+1P+Pl:tchífimid	#;
+Auto:tchífear	#;		
+Rel+Len:tchífeas	#;
